Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.901

Effective date—1993 c 260.

This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1993.

[ 1993 c 260 s 25.]

NOTES:

Implementation—1993 c 260: "The director of licensing may take such steps as are necessary to ensure that this act is implemented on its effective date." [ 1993 c 260 s 24.]